Florida, session 2026, HB549.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section
119.0714, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
119.0714 Court files; court records; official records.—
(1) COURT FILES.—Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to exempt from s. 119.07(1) a public record that was
made a part of a court file and that is not specifically closed
by order of court, except:
(k)1. A petition, and the contents thereof, for an
injunction for protection against domestic violence, repeat
violence, dating violence, sexual violence, serious violence by
a known person, stalking, or cyberstalking which that is
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb549-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 549 2026
dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at an ex parte hearing
due to failure to state a claim or lack of jurisdiction, or
dismissed for any reason having to do with the sufficiency of
the petition itself without an injunction being issued on or
after July 1, 2017, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
Art. I of the State Constitution.
2. A petition, and the contents thereof, for an injunction
for protection against domestic violence, repeat violence,
dating violence, sexual violence, stalking, or cyberstalking
which that is dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at an ex
parte hearing due to failure to state a claim or lack of
jurisdiction, or dismissed for any reason having to do with the
sufficiency of the petition itself without an injunction being
issued before July 1, 2017, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution only upon request by an
individual named in the petition as a respondent. The request
must be in the form of a signed, legibly written request
specifying the case name, case number, document heading, and
page number. The request must be delivered by mail, facsimile,
or electronic transmission or in person to the clerk of the
court. A fee may not be charged for such request.
3. Any information that can be used to identify a
petitioner or respondent in a petition for an injunction against
domestic violence, repeat violence, dating violence, sexual
violence, serious violence by a known person, stalking, or
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb549-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 549 2026
cyberstalking, and any affidavits, notice of hearing, and
temporary injunction, is confidential and exempt from s.
119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until
the respondent has been personally served with a copy of the
petition for injunction, affidavits, notice of hearing, and
temporary injunction.
Section 2. (1) The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that a petition, and the contents thereof, for an
injunction for protection against serious violence by a known
person which is dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at an ex
parte hearing due to failure to state a claim or lack of
jurisdiction, or dismissed for any reason having to do with the
sufficiency of the petition itself without an injunction being
issued be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and
s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The Legislature
finds that the existence of, and the unverified allegations
contained in, such a petition may be defamatory to an individual
named in it and cause unwarranted damage to the reputation of
such individual. The Legislature further finds that removing
such a record from public disclosure is the sole means of
protecting the reputation of such an individual.
(2) Additionally, the Legislature finds that it is a
public necessity that any information that can be used to
identify a petitioner or respondent in a petition for an
injunction against serious violence by a known person, and any
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb549-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 549 2026
affidavits, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, be made
confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and
s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The release of
such information before the respondent has been personally
served with a copy of the petition, affidavits, notice of
hearing, or temporary injunction could significantly threaten
the physical safety and security of persons seeking protection
through injunctive proceedings and their families, and of law
enforcement tasked with serving the petition for injunction,
affidavits, notice of hearing, or temporary injunction on the
respondent. The harm that may result from the release of the
information outweighs any public benefit that might result from
public disclosure of the information.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 547 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb549-00